New Jersey, session 222, A2186.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop policies which require that indictment pleadings, plea agreements, motions, and other pertinent court documents that are presented pretrial or in court during a criminal proceeding be translated into the primary language of the criminal defendant, a witness, or a person with legal decision-making authority for a defendant including, but not limited to, a legal guardian.  The courts shall facilitate access by providing written materials in translated form for those with limited English proficiency. Interpreters, as provided under N.J.S.2B:8-1, may assist in the written translation of the documents when practicable.  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall determine and identify which documents are to be translated for purposes of promoting language access services that are suited to the needs of the communities of New Jersey. b.    The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop policies which implement translation services for languages including, but not limited to, the following: (1)   Spanish; (2)   Chinese; (3)   Portuguese; (4)   Italian; (5)   Korean; (6)   Hindi; (7)   Arabic; (8)   Haitian Creole; and (9)   French. 2.    The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop policies that ensure courthouses post and maintain signs in heavily trafficked areas including, but not limited to, waiting rooms, reception areas, and points of entry, informing the public of the right to have court documents in their primary language as required in section 1 of this act. The signs shall be conspicuous and include brief information including, but not limited to, availability of language assistance services such as translation and interpretation.  The signs shall invite persons with limited English proficiency to identify themselves as persons requiring language access services. The signs shall be presented in English, Spanish, and any other language the Administrative Office of the Courts deems necessary to effectuate this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.